tools/nvda/louis/tables/hu-hu-g2_exceptions.cti
# liblouis: Hungarian Grade 2 table
#
#  Copyright (C) 2017 Attila Hammer from IT Foundation for the Visually Impaired - Hungary. www.infoalap.hu
#
#  This file is part of liblouis.
#
#  liblouis is free software: you can redistribute it and/or modify it
#  under the terms of the GNU Lesser General Public License as
#  published by the Free Software Foundation, either version 2.1 of the
#  License, or (at your option) any later version.
#
#  liblouis is distributed in the hope that it will be useful, but
#  WITHOUT ANY WARRANTY; without even the implied warranty of
#  MERCHANTABILITY or FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE. See the GNU
#  Lesser General Public License for more details.
#
#  You should have received a copy of the GNU Lesser General Public
#  License along with liblouis. If not, see
#  <http://www.gnu.org/licenses/>.
#
#  Maintained by Attila Hammer  hammer.attila@infoalap.hu
#
# If you found bugs with hungarian grade1 table, report it with following address:
# Attila Hammer <hammer.attila@infoalap.hu
#If you have a Launchpad account, report table related requests with following bug tracker address: https://bugs.launchpad.net/belin

#simple abbreviations
endword babban =
endword cabban =
endword csabban 146-1-12-12-1-1345	For example makacsabban
endword dabban =	For example szabadabban word
always szabadabban 156-145-1-12-12-1-1345
endword fabban =
endword gabban =
endword gyabban 1456-1-12-12-1-1345
endword habban =
endword jabban =
endword kabban =
endword labban =
endword lyabban 456-15-12-12-15-1345
endword mabban =
endword nabban =
endword nyabban 1246-1-12-12-1-1345
endword pabban =
endword rabban =
endword sabban =
endword szabban 156-1-12-12-1-1345
endword tabban =
endword tyabban 1256-1-12-12-1-1345
endword vabban =
endword zabban 126-1-12-12-1-1345
endword zsabban 345-1-12-12-1-1345
endword ábban =
endword bebben =
endword cebben =
endword csebben 146-15-12-12-15-1345
endword debben =
always rövidebben 1235-145-15-12-12-15-1345
endword febben =
endword gebben =
endword gyebben 1456-15-12-12-15-1345
endword hebben =
endword jebben =
endword kebben =
endword lebben =
endword lebbem =
endword lyebben 456-15-12-12-15-1345
endword nebben =
endword nyebben 1246-15-12-12-15-1345
endword mebben =
endword pebben =
endword rebben =
endword sebben =
always vörösebben =
always sikeresebben =
endword szebben 156-15-12-12-15-1345
word szebben 156-15-12-12-15-1345
endword tebben =
endword tyebben 1256-15-12-12-15-1345
endword vebben =
endword zebben 126-15-12-12-15-1345
endword zsebben 345-15-12-12-15-1345
endword ébben =
endword ibban =
endword ibben =
endword íbben =
endword obban =
endword óbban =
endword öbben =
endword őbben =
endword ubban =
endword úbban =
endword übben =
endword űbben =
endword ban 12
endword ben 12
endword -ban 36-12
endword -BAN 123
#noback context $U.["-BAN"] @36-12	If a capital word containing the full capitalized -BAN suffix, need put a 46 dot combination, and a single b letter
endword -ben 36-12
endword ból 12-123
endword ből 12-123
endword -ból 36-12-123
endword -ből 36-12-123
endword hoz 125-126
endword hez 125-126
endword höz 125-126
endword -hoz 36-125-126
endword -hez 36-125-126
endword -höz 36-125-126
endword ként 13-2345
endword -ként 36-13-2345
endword ról 1235-123
endword ről 1235-123
endword -ról 36-1235-123
endword -ről 36-1235-123
endword tól 2345-123
endword től 2345-123
endword -tól 36-2345-123
endword -től 36-2345-123
endword val 1236
endword vel 1236
endword -val 36-1236
endword -vel 36-1236
word csak 146
word de 145
word és 16
word hogy 125
word is 24
word így 34
word kell 13
word lesz 123
word mely 134
word nem 1345
word óta 246
word pedig 1234
word tehát 2345
word után 136
word úgy 346
word van 1236
partword kapoccsal 13-1-1234-135-146-1236
word kapoccsal 13-1-1234-135-146-1236
partword kapoccsá 13-1-1234-135-146-146-4
word kapoccsá 13-1-1234-135-146-146-4

#abbreviations, with possible using word parts too
always csakis 146-24
always csakhogy 146-125
always csaknem 146-1345
always csakugyan 146-136-1456-1-1345
always csakhamar 146-125-1-134-1-1235
always akárcsak 1-13-4-135-146
always ugyancsak 136-1456-1-1345-146
always dehogy 145-125
always nemde 1345-145
always éspedig 16-234-1234
always mégpedig 134-16-1245-1234
always dehogyis 145-125-24
always úgyis 346-24
always nemcsak 1345-146
always majdnem 134-1-245-145-1345
always nemrég 1345-1235-16-1245
always nemlátó 1345-123-4-2345-246
always azóta 1-126-246
always ezóta 15-126-246
always mióta 134-24-246
always régóta 1235-16-1245-246
always azután 1-126-136
always ezután 15-126-136
always miután 134-24-136
always délután 145-16-123-136
always délutánnal 145-16-123-136-1236
always akárhogy 1-13-4-1235-125
always alighanem 1-123-24-1245-125-1-1345
always alighogy 1-123-24-1245-125
always amely 1-134
always amellyel 1-134-1236
always aminthogy 1-134-2345-125
always amióta 1-134-24-246
always azazhogy 1-126-1-126-125
always azóta 1-126-246
always bárhogy 12-4-1235-125
always csakannyi 146-1-24
always csakennyi 146-15-24
always csakhogy 146-125
always csakígy 146-34
always csakilyen 146-24-456-15-1345
always csakolyan 146-135-456-1-1345
always csakúgy 146-346
always dehogyisnem 145-125-24-234-1345-15-134
always dehogynem 145-125-1345
always épphogy 16-1234-1234-125
always ezóta 15-126-246
always hanem 125-1-1345
always hogymint 125-134-2345
always majdcsak 134-1-245-145-146
always majdhogy 134-1-245-145-125
always márpedig 134-4-1235-1234
always mégiscsak 134-16-1245-24-234-146
always mellyel 134-1236
always merthogy 134-15-1235-2345-125
always mígnem 134-34-1245-1345
always mindenhogy 134-145-15-1345-125
always minthogy 134-2345-125
always mivelhogy 134-24-1236-15-123-125
always semhogy 234-15-134-125
always úgyhogy 346-125

#two braille mark containing word abbreviations
always annyi 1-24
always boldog 12-1245
always ennyi 15-24
always gond 1245-145
always függ 1245-1245
always függésszerű 1245-1245-156-15-1235-23456	For example függésszerű word

always gyors 1456-234
always keresz 13-15-1235-15-156
always keres 13-234
always mind 134-145
always mint 134-2345
always ország 135-1245
always olvas 135-234
always össze 12345-15
always összekap 12345-15-13-1-1234
always pont 1234-2345
always ponttal 1234-2345-1236
always ponty 1234-135-1345-1256
always ponttyal 1234-135-1345-1256-1236
always pontty 1234-135-1345-1256-1256
always pénz 1234-126
always rövid 1235-145
always rövidítéssz 1235-145-234-156	For example rövidítésszótárnak word
always forr 1235-1235
always szabad 156-145
always tanács 2345-146
always tanáccsal 2345-146-1236	For example tanáccsal word suffix abbreviation
always teljes 2345-234
always világ 1236-1245
always világosabban 1236-1245-135-234-1-12-12-1-1345
always gyorsabban 1456-234-1-12-12-1-1345
always leggyorsabban 123-15-1245-1456-234-1-12-12-1-1345
always világos 1236-1245-135-234
always volt 1236-2345
always interjúvolt 24-1345-2345-15-1235-245-346-1236-135-123-2345
always távoltart 2345-4-1236-135-123-2345-1-1235-2345
always mikrovolt =
always mikrovolttal 134-24-13-1235-135-1236-135-123-2345-1236
always mikrovolt-tal 134-24-13-1235-135-1236-135-123-2345-36-1236
always kilovolt =
always kilovolttal 13-24-123-135-1236-135-123-2345-1236
always kilovolt-tal 13-24-123-135-1236-135-123-2345-36-1236
always millivolt =
always millivolttal 134-24-123-123-24-1236-135-123-2345-1236
always millivolt-tal 134-24-123-123-24-1236-135-123-2345-36-1236
always voltnál =
always voltnak =
always volt-nak =
always voltnyi 1236-135-123-2345-1246-24
always volt-nyi 1236-135-123-2345-36-1246-24
always volton =
always voltos =
always voltot =
always voltban 1236-135-123-2345-12
always volt-ban 1236-135-123-2345-36-12
always voltból 1236-135-123-2345-12-123
always volt-ból 1236-135-123-2345-36-12-123
always volthoz 1236-135-123-2345-125-126
always volt-hoz 1236-135-123-2345-36-125-126
always voltra =
always volt-ra =
always voltról 1236-135-123-2345-1235-123
always volt-ról 1236-135-123-2345-36-1235-123
always volttal 1236-135-123-2345-1236
always volt-tal 1236-135-123-2345-36-1236
always volttól 1236-135-123-2345-2345-123
always volt-tól 1236-135-123-2345-36-2345-123
always voltmérő =
always elektronvolt =
always elektronvolttal 15-123-15-13-2345-1235-135-1345-1236-135-123-2345-1236
always elektronvolt-tal 15-123-15-13-2345-1235-135-1345-1236-135-123-2345-36-1236
joinword a 2
joinword A 2
joinword az 3

#Other grammatic suffixes related abbreviations
endword bbal 12-1236
endword bbel 12-1236
endword ccal 14-1236
endword ccel 14-1236
endword ccsal 146-1236
endword ccsel 146-1236
endword chcsal 14-125-1236
endword chcsel 14-125-1236
endword chhal 14-125-1236
endword chhel 14-125-1236
endword ddal 145-1236
endword ddel 145-1236
endword ffal 124-1236
endword ffel 124-1236
endword ggal 1245-1236
endword ghgal 1245-125-1236
endword ggel 1245-1236
endword ghgel 1245-125-1236
endword ggyal 1456-1236
endword ggyel 1456-1236
endword hhal 125-1236
endword hhel 125-1236
endword jjal 245-1236
endword jjel 245-1236
endword kkal 13-1236
endword kkel 13-1236
endword llal 123-1236
endword llel 123-1236
endword llyal 456-1236
endword llyel 456-1236
endword mmal 134-1236
endword mmel 134-1236
endword nnal 1345-1236
endword nnel 1345-1236
endword nnyal 1246-1236
endword nnyel 1246-1236
endword ppal 1234-1236
endword ppel 1234-1236
endword rral 1235-1236
endword rrel 1235-1236
endword ssal 234-1236
endword ssel 234-1236
endword sszal 156-1236
endword sszel 156-1236
endword ttal 2345-1236
endword ttel 2345-1236
endword ttyal 1256-1236
endword ttyel 1256-1236
endword vval 1236-1236
endword vvel 1236-1236
endword wval 2456-1236
endword wvel 2456-1236
endword xszal 1346-1236
endword xszel 1346-1236
endword yval 13456-1236
endword yvel 13456-1236
endword zzal 126-1236
endword zzel 126-1236
endword zzsal 345-1236
endword zzsel 345-1236
endword -bal 36-1236
endword -bel 36-1236
endword -cal 36-1236
endword -cel 36-1236
endword -csal 36-1236
endword -csel 36-1236
endword -del 36-1236
endword -gyal 36-1236
endword -gyel 36-1236
endword -kal 36-1236
endword -kel 36-1236
endword -lal 36-1236
endword -lel 36-1236
endword -mal 36-1236
endword -mel 36-1236
endword -nel 36-1236
endword -ral 36-1236
endword -rel 36-1236
endword -sal 36-1236
endword -sel 36-1236
endword -szal 36-1236
endword -szel 36-1236
endword -tal 36-1236
endword -tel 36-1236
endword -zal 36-1236
endword -zel 36-1236
endword -zsal 36-1236
endword -zsel 36-1236
